Idaho, session 2026, H0637.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-9803, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 2,
Chapter 107, Laws of 2025, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
67-9803 67-9903. GOLD AND SILVER COIN AND SPECIE. (1) To the full ex-
tent allowed by clause 1, section 10, article I of, and the tenth amendment
to, the constitution of the United States, gold and silver coin and specie
minted domestically foreign or domestic shall be legal tender in the state of
Idaho under the laws of this state. The state may also elect to use gold and
silver coin and specie in conducting its business.
(2) Unless expressly provided by statute or by contract, no person or
other entity may compel another person or other entity to tender or accept
gold or silver coin or specie unless agreed upon by the parties.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.